Illinois, session 104th, SB1867.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 521B-30 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-30)7    Sec. 21B-30. Educator testing.8    (a) (Blank).9    (b) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 10State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, shall design 11and implement a system of examinations, which shall be 12required prior to the issuance of educator licenses. These 13examinations and indicators must be based on national and 14State professional teaching standards, as determined by the 15State Board of Education, in consultation with the State 16Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of 17Education may adopt such rules as may be necessary to 18implement and administer this Section.19    (c) (Blank).20    (c-5) The State Board must adopt rules to implement a 21paraprofessional competency test. This test would allow an 22applicant seeking an Educator License with Stipulations with a 23paraprofessional educator endorsement to obtain the   SB1867- 2 -LRB104 10664 LNS 20743 b1endorsement if he or she passes the test and meets the other 2requirements of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of Section 321B-20 other than the higher education requirements. 4    (d) All applicants seeking a State license shall be 5required to pass a test of content area knowledge for each area 6of endorsement for which there is an applicable test. There 7shall be no exception to this requirement.8    (d-5) The State Board shall consult with any applicable 9vendors within 90 days after July 28, 2023 (the effective date 10of Public Act 103-402) to develop a plan to transition the test 11of content area knowledge in the endorsement area of 12elementary education, grades one through 6, by July 1, 2026 to 13a content area test that contains testing elements that cover 14bilingualism, biliteracy, oral language development, 15foundational literacy skills, and developmentally appropriate 16higher-order comprehension and on which a valid and reliable 17language and literacy subscore can be determined. The State 18Board shall base its rules concerning the passing subscore on 19the language and literacy portion of the test on the 20recommended cut-score determined in the formal 21standard-setting process. Candidates need not achieve a 22particular subscore in the area of language and literacy. The 23State Board shall aggregate and publish the number of 24candidates in each preparation program who take the test and 25the number who pass the language and literacy portion.26    (e) (Blank).  SB1867- 3 -LRB104 10664 LNS 20743 b1    (f) Beginning on August 4, 2023 (the effective date of 2Public Act 103-488) through August 31, 2025, no candidate 3completing a teacher preparation program in this State or 4candidate subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code is required 5to pass a teacher performance assessment. Except as otherwise 6provided in this Article, beginning on September 1, 2015 until 7August 4, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 103-488) and 8beginning again on September 1, 2025, all candidates 9completing teacher preparation programs in this State and all 10candidates subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code are required 11to pass a teacher performance assessment approved by the State 12Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 13Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of Education 14and the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board are 15required to approve more than one assessment, not from the 16same source. Each teacher preparation program in this State 17may use any evidence-based assessment of teacher effectiveness 18that aligns to current State teaching standards in order for a 19candidate to meet the requirements of this subsection (f). A 20candidate may not be required to submit test materials by 21video submission. Subject to appropriation, an individual who 22holds a Professional Educator License and is employed for a 23minimum of one school year by a school district designated as 24Tier 1 under Section 18-8.15 may, after application to the 25State Board, receive from the State Board a refund for any 26costs associated with completing the teacher performance   SB1867- 4 -LRB104 10664 LNS 20743 b1assessment under this subsection. 2    (f-5) The Teacher Performance Assessment Task Force is 3created to evaluate potential performance-based and objective 4teacher performance assessment systems for implementation 5across all educator preparation programs in this State, with 6the intention of ensuring consistency across programs and 7supporting a thoughtful and well-rounded licensure system. 8Members appointed to the Task Force must reflect the racial, 9ethnic, and geographic diversity of this State. The Task Force 10shall consist of all of the following members:11        (1) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 12    President of the Senate.13        (2) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 14    Minority Leader of the Senate.15        (3) One member of the House of Representatives, 16    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.17        (4) One member of the House of Representatives, 18    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 19    Representatives.20        (5) One member who represents a statewide professional 21    teachers' organization, appointed by the State 22    Superintendent of Education.23        (6) One member who represents a different statewide 24    professional teachers' organization, appointed by the 25    State Superintendent of Education.26        (7) One member from a statewide organization   SB1867- 5 -LRB104 10664 LNS 20743 b1    representing school principals, appointed by the State 2    Superintendent of Education.3        (8) One member from a statewide organization 4    representing regional superintendents of schools, 5    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.6        (9) One member from a statewide organization 7    representing school administrators, appointed by the State 8    Superintendent of Education.9        (10) One member representing a school district 10    organized under Article 34 of this Code, appointed by the 11    State Superintendent of Education.12        (11) One member of an association representing rural 13    and small schools, appointed by the State Superintendent 14    of Education.15        (12) One member representing a suburban school 16    district, appointed by the State Superintendent of 17    Education.18        (13) One member from a statewide organization 19    representing school districts in the southern suburbs of 20    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 21    of Education.22        (14) One member from a statewide organization 23    representing large unit school districts, appointed by the 24    State Superintendent of Education.25        (15) One member from a statewide organization 26    representing school districts in the collar counties of   SB1867- 6 -LRB104 10664 LNS 20743 b1    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 2    of Education.3        (16) Three members, each representing a different 4    public university in this State and each a current member 5    of the faculty of an approved educator preparation 6    program, appointed by the State Superintendent of 7    Education.8        (17) Three members, each representing a different 9    4-year nonpublic university or college in this State and 10    each a current member of the faculty of an approved 11    educator preparation program, appointed by the State 12    Superintendent of Education.13        (18) One member of the Board of Higher Education, 14    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.15        (19) One member representing a statewide policy 16    organization advocating on behalf of multilingual students 17    and families, appointed by the State Superintendent of 18    Education.19        (20) One member representing a statewide organization 20    focused on research-based education policy to support a 21    school system that prepares all students for college, a 22    career, and democratic citizenship, appointed by the State 23    Superintendent of Education.24        (21) Two members representing an early childhood 25    advocacy organization, appointed by the State 26    Superintendent of Education.  SB1867- 7 -LRB104 10664 LNS 20743 b1        (22) One member representing a statewide organization 2    that partners with educator preparation programs and 3    school districts to support the growth and development of 4    preservice teachers, appointed by the State Superintendent 5    of Education. 6        (23) One member representing a statewide organization 7    that advocates for educational equity and racial justice 8    in schools, appointed by the State Superintendent of 9    Education.10        (24) One member representing a statewide organization 11    that represents school boards, appointed by the State 12    Superintendent of Education.13        (25) One member who has, within the last 5 years, 14    served as a cooperating teacher, appointed by the State 15    Superintendent of Education. 16    Members of the Task Force shall serve without 17compensation. The Task Force shall first meet at the call of 18the State Superintendent of Education, and each subsequent 19meeting shall be called by the chairperson of the Task Force, 20who shall be designated by the State Superintendent of 21Education. The State Board of Education shall provide 22administrative and other support to the Task Force.23    On or before October 31, 2024, the Task Force shall report 24on its work, including recommendations on a teacher 25performance assessment system in this State, to the State 26Board of Education and the General Assembly. The Task Force is   SB1867- 8 -LRB104 10664 LNS 20743 b1dissolved upon submission of this report. 2    (g) The content area knowledge test and the teacher 3performance assessment shall be the tests that from time to 4time are designated by the State Board of Education, in 5consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 6Board, and may be tests prepared by an educational testing 7organization or tests designed by the State Board of 8Education, in consultation with the State Educator Preparation 9and Licensure Board. The test of content area knowledge shall 10assess content knowledge in a specific subject field. The 11tests must be designed to be racially neutral to ensure that no 12person taking the tests is discriminated against on the basis 13of race, color, national origin, or other factors unrelated to 14the person's ability to perform as a licensed employee. The 15score required to pass the tests shall be fixed by the State 16Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 17Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of 18Education's rules for scoring the content area knowledge test 19may include scoring and retaking of each test section 20separately and independently. The tests shall be administered 21not fewer than 3 times a year at such time and place as may be 22designated by the State Board of Education, in consultation 23with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. 24    The State Board shall implement a test or tests to assess 25the speaking, reading, writing, and grammar skills of 26applicants for an endorsement or a license issued under   SB1867- 9 -LRB104 10664 LNS 20743 b1subdivision (G) of paragraph (2) of Section 21B-20 of this 2Code in the English language and in the language of the 3transitional bilingual education program requested by the 4applicant. 5    (h) Except as provided in Section 34-6 of this Code, the 6provisions of this Section shall apply equally in any school 7district subject to Article 34 of this Code.8    (i) The rules developed to implement and enforce the 9testing requirements under this Section shall include, without 10limitation, provisions governing test selection, test 11validation, and determination of a passing score, 12administration of the tests, frequency of administration, 13applicant fees, frequency of applicants taking the tests, the 14years for which a score is valid, and appropriate special 15accommodations. The State Board of Education shall develop 16such rules as may be needed to ensure uniformity from year to 17year in the level of difficulty for each form of an assessment.18(Source: P.A. 102-301, eff. 8-26-21; 103-402, eff. 7-28-23; 19103-488, eff. 8-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-780, eff. 208-2-24; 103-811, eff. 8-9-24; 103-846, eff. 8-9-24.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 222025.